Hawaii statutes.
[§328-80] Home-based agricultural producer
of honey; inspections. If the department receives a consumer complaint
about a home-based agricultural producer of honey, the producer shall be
subject to food sampling and subsequent inspection of its premises to determine
if the producer's products are misbranded or adulterated. [L 2005, c 63, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next